Utah statutes.
17B-1-306.   Local district board -- Election procedures.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (11), each elected board member shall be
selected as provided in this section.
(2) (a)  Each election of a local district board member shall be held:
(i)  at the same time as the municipal general election; and
(ii)  at polling places designated by the county clerk in consultation with
the local district for each county in which the local district is located,
which polling places shall coincide with municipal general election polling
places whenever feasible.
(b) (i)  Subject to Subsections (4)(f) and (g), the number of polling places
under Subsection (2)(a)(ii) in an election of board members of an irrigation
district shall be one polling place per division of the district, designated
by the district board.
(ii)  Each polling place designated by an irrigation district board under
Subsection (2)(b)(i) shall coincide with a polling place designated by the
county clerk under Subsection (2)(a)(ii).
(3) (a)  The clerk of each local district with a board member position to be
filled at the next municipal general election shall provide notice of:
(i)  each elective position of the local district to be filled at the next
municipal general election;
(ii)  the constitutional and statutory qualifications for each position; and
(iii)  the dates and times for filing a declaration of candidacy.
(b)  The notice required under Subsection (3)(a) shall be:
(i)  posted in at least five public places within the local district at least
10 days before the first day for filing a declaration of candidacy; or
(ii) (A)  published in a newspaper of general circulation within the local
district at least three but no more than 10 days before the first day for
filing a declaration of candidacy; and
(B)  published, in accordance with Section 45-1-101, for 10 days before the
first day for filing a declaration of candidacy.
(4) (a)  To become a candidate for an elective local district board position,
the prospective candidate shall file a declaration of candidacy in person with
the local district, during office hours and not later than the close of normal
office hours between July 1 and July 15 of any odd-numbered year.
(b)  When July 15 is a Saturday, Sunday, or holiday, the filing time shall be
extended until the close of normal office hours on the following regular
business day.
(c) (i)  Before the filing officer may accept any declaration of candidacy,
the filing officer shall:
(A)  read to the prospective candidate the constitutional and statutory
qualification requirements for the office that the candidate is seeking; and
(B)  require the candidate to state whether or not the candidate meets those
requirements.
(ii)  If the prospective candidate does not meet the qualification
requirements for the office, the filing officer may not accept the declaration
of candidacy.
(iii)  If it appears that the prospective candidate meets the requirements of
candidacy, the filing officer shall accept the declaration of candidacy.
(d)  The declaration of candidacy shall substantially comply with the
following form:
"I, (print name) ____________, being first duly sworn, say that I reside at
(Street) ____________, City of ________________, County of ________________,
State of Utah, (Zip Code) ______, (Telephone Number, if any)____________; that
I meet the qualifications for the office of board of trustees member for
_______________________ (state the name of the local district); that I am a
candidate for that office to be voted upon at the next election, and I hereby
request that my name be printed upon the official ballot for that election.
(Signed) _________________________________________
Subscribed and sworn to (or affirmed) before me by ____________ on this ______
day of ____________, ____.
(Signed) ________________________
(Clerk or Notary Public)"
(e)  Each person wishing to become a valid write-in candidate for an elective
local district board position is governed by Section 20A-9-601.
(f)  If at least one person does not file a declaration of candidacy as
required by this section, a person shall be appointed to fill that board
position by following the procedures and requirements for appointment
established in Section 20A-1-512.
(g)  If only one candidate files a declaration of candidacy and there is no
write-in candidate who complies with Section 20A-9-601, the board need not
hold an election for that position and may appoint the candidate to the board.
(5) (a)  A primary election may be held if:
(i)  the election is authorized by the local district board; and
(ii)  the number of candidates for a particular local board position or office
exceeds twice the number of persons needed to fill that position or office.
(b)  The primary election shall be conducted:
(i)  on the same date as the municipal primary election, as provided for in
Section 20A-1-201.5; and
(ii)  according to the procedures for municipal primary elections provided
under Title 20A, Election Code.
(6) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (6)(c), the local district clerk
shall certify the candidate names to the clerk of each county in which the
local district is located no later than August 20 of the municipal election
year.
(b) (i)  Except as provided in Subsection (6)(c), the clerk of each county in
which the local district is located shall coordinate the placement of the name
of each candidate for local district office in the nonpartisan section of the
municipal general election ballot with the municipal election clerk.
(ii)  If consolidation of the local district election ballot with the
municipal general election ballot is not feasible, the county clerk shall
provide for a separate local district election ballot to be administered by
poll workers at polling locations designated under Subsection (2).
(c) (i)  Subsections (6)(a) and (b) do not apply to an election of a member of
the board of an irrigation district established under Chapter 2a, Part 5,
Irrigation District Act.
(ii) (A)  Subject to Subsection (6)(c)(ii)(B), the board of each irrigation
district shall prescribe the form of the ballot for each board member
election.
(B)  Each ballot for an election of an irrigation district board member shall
be in a nonpartisan format.
(7) (a)  Each voter at an election for a board of trustees member of a local
district shall:
(i)  be a registered voter within the district, except for an election of:
(A)  an irrigation district board of trustees member; or
(B)  a basic local district board of trustees member who is elected by
property owners; and
(ii)  meet the requirements to vote established by the district.
(b)  Each voter may vote for as many candidates as there are offices to be
filled.
(c)  The candidates who receive the highest number of votes are elected.
(8)  Except as otherwise provided by this section, the election of local
district board members is governed by Title 20A, Election Code.
(9) (a)  A person elected to serve on a local district board shall serve a
four-year term, beginning at noon on the January 1 after the person's
election.
(b)  A person elected shall be sworn in as soon as practical after January 1.
(10) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (10)(b), each local district shall
reimburse the county or municipality holding an election under this section
for the costs of the election attributable to that local district.
(b)  Each irrigation district shall bear its own costs of each election it
holds under this section.
(11)  This section does not apply to an improvement district that provides
electric or gas service.
(12)  The provisions of Title 20A, Chapter 3, Part 6, Early Voting, do not
apply to an election under this section.
